North Carolina, session 2025, HB210.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 65-48 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(2a) "Care and maintenance" means all general work necessary to keep the
cemetery property in a presentable condition at all times, including the cutting
of grass at reasonable intervals; the raking, cleaning, filling, seeding, and
sodding of graves; the replacement, pruning, or removal of shrubs and trees
in order to assure access to interment rights; and the repair and maintenance
of enclosures, buildings, drives, walks, and the various memorial gardens."
SECTION 2. G.S. 65-53 reads as rewritten:
"§ 65-53. Powers.
In addition to other powers conferred by this Article, the Cemetery Commission shall have
the following powers and duties:
…
(7a) To promulgate rules and regulations establishing minimum standards for the
care and maintenance of cemeteries. The rules and regulations shall provide
that if, after an investigation conducted as authorized by subdivision (3) of
this section, the licensee is found in violation of the minimum standards for
care and maintenance, the Commission in collaboration with the North
Carolina Cemetery Association may, in addition to revoking or suspending
the license of the licensee, as authorized by subdivision (3) of this section,
impose a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) to be recovered in a civil action
in the nature of debt if the licensee does not pay the penalty within a prescribed
period of time which shall not exceed 30 days. Each day's continuing violation
shall be a separate and distinct offense; provided, however, before a penalty
may be imposed under this subdivision, the Commission shall give the
licensee at least 10 days' notice in writing stating the alleged violation of the
minimum standards for care and maintenance and giving the licensee an
opportunity within the 20-day period following the issuance of the notice to
cure the violation. The clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed pursuant to
this subdivision shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in
accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 65-62 reads as rewritten:
"§ 65-62. Individual contracts for care and maintenance.
*H210-v-4*

At the time of making a sale or receiving the initial deposit hereunder, the cemetery company
shall deliver to the person to whom such sale is made, or who makes such deposit, an instrument
in writing which shall specifically state that the net income of the care and maintenance trust
fund shall be used solely for the care and maintenance of the cemetery, for reasonable costs of
administering such care and maintenance and for reasonable costs of administering the trust fund.
Within 60 days after the end of the calendar or fiscal year of the cemetery company, the cemetery
company shall furnish adequate reports with the details of the care and maintenance work
performed on forms provided by the Commission."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 2 House Bill 210-Ratified